Utah statutes.
17-36-48.   Reserve fund for capital improvements -- Transfer to fund of unencumbered surplus county funds.

At any time after the creation of a reserve fund under Section 17-36-46, the county legislative body may transfer to the fund any unencumbered surplus county funds remaining at the end of a fiscal year.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

